test/src/morphology/izh-test-N-oikehus_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - oikehus: # Noun 'right'
     oikehus+N+Sg+Nom: oikehus
     oikehus+N+Sg+Gen: oikehuen
     oikehus+N+Sg+Acc: oikehuen
     oikehus+N+Sg+Part: oikehutta
     oikehus+N+Sg+Ill: oikehuee
     oikehus+N+Sg+Ine: oikehues
     oikehus+N+Sg+Ela: oikehuest
     oikehus+N+Sg+All: oikehuelle
     oikehus+N+Sg+Ade: oikehuel
     oikehus+N+Sg+Abl: oikehuelt
     oikehus+N+Sg+Tra: oikehueks
     oikehus+N+Sg+Ess: oikehuenna
     oikehus+N+Sg+Exe: oikehuent

     oikehus+N+Pl+Nom: oikehuet
     oikehus+N+Pl+Gen: oikehuksiin
     oikehus+N+Pl+Acc: oikehuet
     oikehus+N+Pl+Part: oikehuksia
     oikehus+N+Pl+Ill: oikehuksii
     oikehus+N+Pl+Ine: oikehuksis
     oikehus+N+Pl+Ela: oikehuksist
     oikehus+N+Pl+All: oikehuksille
     oikehus+N+Pl+Ade: oikehuksil
     oikehus+N+Pl+Abl: oikehuksilt
     oikehus+N+Pl+Tra: oikehuksiks
     oikehus+N+Pl+Ess: oikehuksinna
     oikehus+N+Pl+Exe: oikehuksint
